Hawaii statutes.
§107-6 Standards prescribed by department.
All matters pertaining to land surveying, mapping, studying land titles and
boundaries, preparing metes and bounds descriptions, setting centerline highway
monuments, and other work related thereto performed by the department of
transportation shall be performed in conformance with the professional
standards to be prescribed by the department of accounting and general services
and the cost in connection therewith shall be borne by the department of
transportation. [L 1951, c 283, §4; RL 1955, §103-4; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1,
§§12, 26; HRS §107-6]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next